Utah statutes.
4-2-11.   Attorney general legal advisor for department -- County or district attorney may bring action upon request of department for violations of title.

(1)  The attorney general is the legal advisor for the department and shall defend the department and its representatives in all actions and proceedings brought against it.

(2)  The county attorney or the district attorney as provided under Sections 17-18a-202 and 17-18a-203 of the county in which a cause of action arises or a public offense occurs may bring civil or criminal action, upon request of the department, to enforce the laws, standards, orders, and rules of the department or to prosecute violations of this title.  If the county attorney or district attorney fails to act, the department may request the attorney general to bring an action on behalf of the department.



Amended by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

